Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-219
Constitutional convention; candidates; petitions; time of filing.

The nominating petitions shall be filed with the Secretary of State not earlier than July 1 of the year the election is to be held and not later than August 1 of the same year.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 8, p. 551.